District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.14

Criminal penalties; prosecution by Attorney General.

An athlete agent who violates § 47-2887.13 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment of 6 months, or both. Violations shall be prosecuted by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(l)(11), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(y), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “maximum fine of $10,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(y) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 15 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.